Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.390

Organization—Ballots.

The proposition on the ballot shall be: "Shall the proposition to organize the city of (name of city) under the commission form of government be adopted?" followed by the words: "For organization as a city under commission form" and "against organization as a city under commission form." The election shall be conducted, the vote canvassed, and the result declared in the same manner as provided by law in respect to other city elections. If a majority of the votes cast are in favor thereof the city shall proceed to elect a mayor and two commissioners.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.390. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 2, part; RRS s 9091, part.]

NOTES:

Canvassing returns, generally: Chapter 29A.60 RCW.

Conduct of elections—Canvass: RCW 29A.60.010.